North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12 Corrections, Parole, and Probation
CHAPTER 12-60 Bureau of Criminal Investigation
12-60-24.
Criminal history record checks. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Each applicant, employee, or petitioner for adoption or name change who is subject to a criminal history record check under subsection 2 shall consent to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check for the purpose of determining suitability or fitness for a permit, license, registration, employment, or adoption.

Each applicant, employee, registrant, or petitioner for adoption or name change subject to a criminal history record check shall provide to the requesting agency or entity written consent to conduct the check and to release or disclose the information in accordance with state and federal law, two sets of fingerprints from a law enforcement agency or other local agency authorized to take fingerprints, any other identifying information requested, and a statement indicating whether the applicant or employee has ever been convicted of a crime.

The agency, official, or entity shall submit these fingerprints to the bureau of criminal investigation for nationwide criminal history record information that includes resubmission of the fingerprints by the bureau of criminal investigation to the federal bureau of investigation. Except if otherwise provided by law, federal bureau of investigation criminal history record information obtained by an agency or entity is confidential. For a request for nationwide criminal history record information made under this section, the bureau of criminal investigation is the sole source to receive the fingerprint submissions and responses from the federal bureau of investigation. A person who takes fingerprints under this section may charge a reasonable fee to offset the cost of fingerprinting. Unless otherwise provided by law, the bureau of criminal investigation may charge appropriate fees for criminal history information.

Fingerprints and any other identifying information the bureau has obtained under this section may be retained by the bureau and the federal bureau of investigation at the request of the agency, official, or entity submitting the fingerprints and any other identifying information for a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The subject of the records must be provided notice of the retention of the fingerprints and any other identifying information. The bureau may provide to each agency, official, or entity listed in subsection 2 of this section the response of the bureau and the federal bureau of investigation any statewide criminal history record information that may lawfully be made available under this chapter.

The bureau may provide the results of a criminal history background check made under subsection 2 of this section to another state’s identification bureau or central repository for the collection, maintenance, and dissemination of criminal history record information when the other state’s identification bureau or central repository has requested the results of the criminal history background check and the agency, official, or entity of the other state has equivalent authority to subsection 2 of this section to request a statewide and nationwide criminal history check.

The bureau of criminal investigation shall provide to each agency, official, or entity listed in this subsection who has requested a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check, the response of the federal bureau of investigation and any statewide criminal history record information that may lawfully be made available under this chapter:

The governing body of a city or a county, by ordinance or resolution, for a final applicant for a specified occupation with the city or county.

The agriculture commissioner for each applicant for a license to grow or process hemp under section 4.1-18.1-02.

The education standards and practices board for initial, re-entry, and reciprocal teacher licenses under sections 15.1-13-14 and 15.1-13-20 and school guidance and counseling services under section 15.1-13-23.

The North Dakota board of medicine for licenses or disciplinary investigations under section 43-17-07.1, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

The private investigative and security board for licenses or registrations under section 43-30-06.

The department of human services for foster care licenses, approvals, and identified relatives under chapter 50-11, appointments of legal guardians under chapter 50-11.3, and petitions for adoptions under chapter 50-12, except that the criminal history record investigation must be conducted in accordance with those chapters. A criminal history record investigation completed under chapter 50-11, 50-11.3, or 50-12 may be used to satisfy the requirements of a criminal history record investigation under either of the other two chapters.

The department of human services for criminal history record checks authorized under section 50-06-01.9.

The chief information officer of the information technology department for certain individuals under section 54-59-20.

A public peace officer training school that has been approved by the peace officer standards and training board for enrollees in the school. The school may only disclose the criminal history record information as authorized by law. The school shall pay the costs for securing the fingerprints, any criminal history record information made available under this chapter, and for the nationwide criminal history record check. This subdivision does not apply to the highway patrol law enforcement training center and enrollees who have a limited license under section 12-63-09.

The North Dakota public employees retirement board for individuals first employed by the public employees retirement board after July 31, 2005, who have unescorted physical access to the office or any security-sensitive area of the office as designated by the executive director.

The executive director of the retirement and investment office for individuals first employed by the retirement and investment office after July 31, 2005, who have unescorted physical access to the office or any security-sensitive area of the office as designated by the executive director.

The Bank of North Dakota for a final applicant for a specified occupation with the Bank as designated by the president.

Job service North Dakota for all employees, final applicants for employment with job service, and contractors with access to federal tax information.

The state department of health for a final applicant for a job opening or a current employee with the department as designated by the state health officer; an individual being investigated by the department; or, when requested by the department, an applicant for registration as a designated caregiver or a compassion center agent under chapter 19-24.1.

The state board of nursing for applicants, licensees, registrants, or disciplinary investigations under chapter 43-12.1, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

The state board of pharmacy for applicants or disciplinary investigations under chapter 43-15 and registrations, or revocation or suspension of registrations, under chapter 19-03.1, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

The state real estate commission for applicants, licensees, or investigations under chapter 43-23, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the commission.

The North Dakota board of social work examiners for applicants for initial licensure or licensees under chapter 43-41, except that criminal history record checks for licensees need not be made unless required by the board.

All agencies, departments, bureaus, boards, commissions, or institutions of the state, including the North Dakota university system, for all employees or final applicants for employment as a security guard or to otherwise provide security.

The office of management and budget for each individual who has access to personal information as designated by the director.

The department of corrections and rehabilitation for all agents and employees and a final applicant for employment designated by the director and for each agent, employee, or a final applicant for employment of a privately operated entity providing contract correctional services for the department who exercises direct authority over juveniles, inmates, probationers, or parolees.

A city, county, or combination of cities or counties that operates a correctional facility subject to chapter 12-44.1, for each agent and employee and a final applicant for employment of the correctional facility who has direct contact with or exercises direct authority over any juvenile or inmate of the correctional facility, and for each agent, employee, or a final applicant for employment of a privately operated entity providing contract correctional services for the correctional facility who exercises direct authority over juveniles, inmates, probationers, or parolees.

The North Dakota university system for a final applicant for or employee in a specified position in the university system or a university system institution or for each student applying for or admitted to a specified program of study, as designated by the chancellor.

The board of a school district, for employees designated by the board, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check;

The board of a multidistrict special education unit, for employees designated by the board, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check;

The board of an area career and technology center, for employees designated by the board, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check;

The board of a regional education association, for employees designated by the board, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check; and

The superintendent of public instruction in the case of a nonpublic school or a state school with a superintendent appointed by or reporting to the superintendent of public instruction, for employees designated by the nonpublic or state school, provided the nonpublic or state school is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check.

The board of a school district, for a final applicant seeking employment with the district or otherwise providing services to the district, if that individual has unsupervised contact with students, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check;

The board of a multidistrict special education unit, for a final applicant seeking employment with the unit or otherwise providing services to the unit, if that individual has unsupervised contact with students, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check;

The board of an area career and technology center, for a final applicant seeking employment with the center or otherwise providing services to the center, if that individual has unsupervised contact with students, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check;

The board of a regional education association, for a final applicant seeking employment with the association or otherwise providing services to the association if that individual has unsupervised contact with students, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check; and

The superintendent of public instruction in the case of a nonpublic school or a state school with a superintendent appointed by or reporting to the superintendent of public instruction, for a final applicant seeking employment with the school or otherwise providing services to the school, if that individual has unsupervised contact with students, provided the board is responsible for paying the costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check.

For purposes of this subdivision, “unsupervised contact” with students means being in proximity to one or more students, on school grounds or at school functions, outside the presence of an individual who has been subject to a criminal history record check.

The racing commission for applicants for licenses under chapter 53-06.2, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the commission.

A district court for a petition to change a name under chapter 32-28.

The state board of pharmacy for a wholesale drug distributor seeking licensure under chapter 43-15.3.

The board of dental examiners for investigations of applicants or dentists under section 43-28-11.2, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

The department of financial institutions for each applicant for a specified occupation with the department as specified by the commissioner and principal owners and managing officers of applicants for a license from the department of financial institutions.

The office of tax commissioner for all employees, final applicants for employment with the tax commissioner, and contractors with access to federal tax information.

The state board of examiners for nursing home administrators for applicants for licensure or licensees under chapter 43-34, except that criminal history record checks for licensees need not be made unless required by the board.

The marriage and family therapy licensure board for applicants, licensees, or investigations under chapter 43-53, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

The state board of chiropractic examiners for applicants, licensees, certificates, or investigations under chapter 43-06, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

Workforce safety and insurance for a final applicant for a specified occupation with workforce safety and insurance as designated by the director, or for contractors who may have access to confidential information as designated by the director.

The board of counselor examiners for applicants for licensure or licensees under chapter 43-47, except that criminal history record checks for licensees need not be made unless required by the board.

The state board of respiratory care for applicants, licensees, or investigations under chapter 43-42, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

The North Dakota real estate appraiser qualifications and ethics board for applicants for permits or registration or permittees, registrants, owners, or controlling persons under chapters 43-23.3 and 43-23.5, except that criminal history record checks for permittees, registrants, owners, or controlling persons need not be made unless required by the board.

The insurance department for criminal history record checks authorized under chapters 26.1-26 and 26.1-26.8.

The office of the adjutant general for employees and volunteers working with the recruiting and retention, sexual assault, and youth programs.

The parks and recreation department for volunteers and final applicants for employment, as determined by the director of the parks and recreation department.

The North Dakota medical imaging and radiation therapy board of examiners for licensure and licensees under chapter 43-62, except that criminal history record checks for licensees need not be made unless required by the board.

The game and fish department for volunteers and final applicants for employment, as determined by the director of the game and fish department.

The North Dakota board of massage for applicants, licensees, or investigations under chapter 43-25.

The North Dakota board of physical therapy for physical therapist and physical therapist assistant applicants and for licensees under investigation, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

The department of commerce for volunteers and employees providing services through eligible organizations, as determined by the commissioner of commerce.

The state court administrator for a guardian ad litem who provides direct services to youth.

The department of environmental quality for a final applicant for a job opening or a current employee with the department; an individual being investigated by the department; or, when requested by the department, an applicant for a radioactive materials license under chapter 23.1-03 or a solid waste permit under chapter 23.1-08.

The housing finance agency for criminal history record checks authorized under section 54-17-07.13.

The office of state treasurer for each individual who has access to federal tax information.

The public service commission for initial applicant licenses under chapter 51-05.1, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the public service commission.

The department of human services for a criminal history record check for a children’s advocacy center as authorized under section 50-25.1-11.1.

The bureau of criminal investigation shall conduct a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check for the purpose of determining eligibility for a concealed weapons license for each applicant for an initial license or the renewal of a concealed weapons license under chapter 62.1-04. The nationwide criminal history record check must include an inquiry of the national instant criminal background check system, and if the applicant is not a United States citizen, an immigration alien query.

Each applicant for a concealed weapons license shall provide to the bureau of criminal investigation written consent to conduct the criminal history record check, to maintain, release, and disclose the information in accordance with state and federal law, and to make a determination on the application; two sets of fingerprints from a law enforcement agency or other individual authorized to take fingerprints; and any other information required under chapter 62.1-04. The person who takes fingerprints under this subsection may charge a reasonable fee for fingerprinting.

The bureau of criminal investigation shall resubmit the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation. Except as otherwise provided by law, federal bureau of investigation criminal history record information is confidential.

aaa.

The state historical society for volunteers and final applicants for employment, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless requested by the society.

bbb.

The department of transportation for volunteers and final applicants for employment, as determined by the director of the department of transportation.

ccc.

The commission on legal counsel for indigents for a volunteer or final applicant for employment, as determined by the director of the commission on legal counsel for indigents.

ddd.

The board of dietetic practice for applications for licensure or renewal under chapter 43-44, except that criminal history record checks need not be made unless required by the board.

eee.

The secretary of state for employees with access to personally identifying information of residents or businesses of the state or with access to elections systems that are critical infrastructure under section 44-04-24.

fff.

The state department of health for applicants for initial licensure for emergency medical services personnel, such as emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, and paramedics, as required by subdivision d of subsection 3 of section 23-27.1-03.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 100, § 1; 2005, ch. 111, § 4; 2007, ch. 70, § 2; 2007, ch. 115, §§ 3, 4; 2007, ch. 374, § 1; 2007, ch. 367, § 1; 2007, ch. 491, § 1; 2009, ch. 123, § 1; 2009, ch. 377, § 1; 2009, ch. 379, § 1; 2009, ch. 422, §
1; 2011, ch. 94, § 1; 2011, ch. 328, § 1; 2011, ch. 512, § 1; 2011, ch. 327, § 1; 2013, ch. 12, § 7; 2013, ch. 232, § 1; 2013, ch. 324, § 1; 2013, ch. 325, § 1; 2013, ch. 491, § 1; 2015, ch. 67, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 96, § 6, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 97, § 1, effective March 12, 2015; 2015, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 99, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 297, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 302, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 309, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 94, § 1, 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 95, § 1, effective March 3, 2017; 2017, ch. 96, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 199, § 7, effective April 29, 2019; 2017, ch. 286, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 409, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 61, § 2, effective March 29, 2019; 2019, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 101, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 102, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 404, § 1, effective October 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 164, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 218, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 379, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 447, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 452, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 551, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 67, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 96, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 97, S.L. 2015 became effective March 12, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 2 of chapter 97, S.L. 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 98, S.L. 2015 is effective on August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 99, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 100, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 297, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 302, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 309, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 12, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 232, S.L. 2013 becomes effective September 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 324, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 325, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 491, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 94, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 328, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 512, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 327, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

Note.

Section 12-60-24 was amended 10 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 18 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; Section 1 of Chapter 379, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2338; Section 1 of Chapter 164, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1253; Section 1 of Chapter 323, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2187; Section 2 of Chapter 98, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1073; Section 1 of Chapter 98, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1073; Section 1 of Chapter 378, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2131; Section 1 of Chapter 452, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2062; Section 1 of Chapter 218, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2110; and Section 1 of Chapter 447, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2174.

Section 12-60-24 was amended 6 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 102, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1074; Section 1 of Chapter 404, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1102; Section 1 of Chapter 101, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1376; Section 2 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1349; Section 1 of Chapter 239, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1219; and Section 1 of Chapter 100, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1084.

Section 12-60-24 was amended 6 times by the Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 95, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1132; Section 1 of Chapter 286, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1087; Section 1 of Chapter 96, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2131; Section 1 of Chapter 409, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2126; Section 7 of Chapter 199, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2327; and Section 1 of Chapter 94, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1060. [Contingency met in 2019]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.

Section 12-60-24 was amended 9 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 98, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1125; Section 1 of Chapter 97, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1105; Section 1 of Chapter 297, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1153; Section 1 of Chapter 309, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2236; Section 6 of Chapter 96, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2215; Section 3 of Chapter 67, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1436; Section 1 of Chapter 100, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2145; Section 1 of Chapter 99, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2077; and Section 1 of Chapter 302, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2085.

Section 12-60-24 was amended 5 times by the 2013 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 7 of chapter 12, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1012; section 1 of chapter 324, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2110; section 1 of chapter 325, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1389; section 1 of chapter 232, Session Laws 2013, Senate Bill 2304; and section 1 of chapter 491, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1327.

Section 12-60-24 was amended 4 times by the 2011 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 1 of chapter 512, Session Laws 2011, Senate Bill 2114; section 1 of chapter 328, Session Laws 2011, Senate Bill 2097; section 1 of chapter 94, Session Laws 2011, House Bill 1081; and section 1 of chapter 327, Session Laws 2011, Senate Bill 2199.